Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201669-401
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of sections 69-401 to 69-409:

(1) Regulated metals property means catalytic converters, all nonferrous
metal except gold and silver, manhole
covers, sewer grates, or metal beer kegs, including those kegs
made of stainless steel; and

(2) Secondary metals recycler means any person, firm, or corporation
in this state that:

(a) Is engaged in the business of gathering or obtaining regulated metals
property that has served its original economic purpose; or

(b) Is in the business of or has facilities for performing the manufacturing
process by which regulated metals property is converted into raw material
products consisting of prepared grades and having an existing or potential
economic value by methods including, but not limited to, processing, sorting,
cutting, classifying, cleaning, baling, wrapping, shredding, shearing, or
changing the physical form or chemical content of the metals, but not including
the exclusive use of hand tools.

Laws 2008, LB766, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1049, § 1.